North Carolina statutes. Chapter 75. Monopolies, Trusts and Consumer Protection.
Article 6. Truth in Music Advertising Act.

§ 75-125.
Short title and definitions.

Short Title. — This Article may be cited as the Truth in Music Advertising Act.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply in this Article:

Performing group. — A vocal or instrumental group seeking to use the name of another group that has previously released a commercial sound recording under that name.

Recording group. — A vocal or instrumental group at least one of whose members has previously released a commercial sound recording under that group’s name and in which the member or members have a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group.

Sound recording. — A work that results from the fixation on a material object of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds regardless of the nature of the material object, such as a disk, tape, or other phono-record, in which the sounds are embodied.

History.

2009-284, s. 1.

§ 75-126.
Production.

No person shall advertise or conduct a live musical performance or production in this State through the use of a false, deceptive, or misleading affiliation, connection, or association between a performing group and a recording group. This section does not apply if any of the following apply:

The performing group is the authorized registrant and owner of a federal service mark for that group registered in the United States Patent and Trademark Office.

At least one member of the performing group was a member of the recording group and has a legal right by virtue of use or operation under the group name without having abandoned the name or affiliation with the group.

The live musical performance or production is identified in all advertising and promotion as a salute or tribute, or the vocal or instrumental group performing is not so closely related or similar to that used by the recording group that it would tend to confuse or mislead the public.

The advertising does not relate to a live musical performance or production taking place in this State.

The performance or production is expressly authorized by the recording group.

History.

2009-284, s. 1.

§ 75-127.
Penalty.

A person who violates

G.S. 75-126

is liable to the State for a civil penalty of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) nor more than fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per violation, which civil penalty shall be in addition to any other relief which may be granted under other applicable laws. Each performance or production in violation of

G.S. 75-126

shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

2009-284, s. 1.

§ 75-128.
Unfair and deceptive trade practice.

A violation of this Article shall be an unfair and deceptive trade practice under

G.S. 75-1.1

.

History.

2009-284, s. 1.

§§ 75-129 through 75-132.

Reserved for future codification purposes.